Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-839
Civil and criminal proceedings; jurisdiction.

The failure to do any act required by or pursuant to or the performance of any act prohibited by the State Lottery Act shall be deemed an act in part in the principal office of the division. Any criminal prosecution under the act may be conducted in any county where the defendant resides or has a place of business or in any county in which any violation occurred or is deemed to have occurred.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 39;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 58.